Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 2
VEHICLE IDENTIFICATION NUMBER INSPECTION

42-5-201. Definitions.

As used in this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Bonded title vehicle" means a vehicle the owner of which has posted a bond for title pursuant to the provisions of section 42-6-115.

"Commercial vehicle" means any trailer as defined in section 42-1-102 (105), truck as defined in section 42-1-102 (108), or truck tractor as defined in section 42-1-102 (109).

(Deleted by amendment,

L. 2000, p. 1647

, § 36, effective June 1, 2000.)

"Homemade vehicle" means a vehicle which is constructed by a manufacturer not licensed by the state of Colorado and which is not recognizable as a commercially manufactured vehicle.

"Inspector" means a duly constituted peace officer of a law enforcement agency or other individual who has been certified pursuant to section 42-5-206 to inspect vehicle identification numbers.

"Law enforcement agency" means the Colorado state patrol or the agency of a local government authorized to enforce the laws of the state of Colorado.

"Local government" means a town, a city, a county, or a city and county.

"Rebuilt vehicle" means a vehicle which has been assembled from parts of two or more commercially manufactured vehicles or which has been altered in such a manner that it is not readily recognizable as a commercially manufactured vehicle of a given year. "Rebuilt vehicle" includes a street rod vehicle.

"Reconstructed vehicle" means a vehicle constructed from two or more commercially manufactured vehicles of the same type and year which has not been altered and which is recognizable as a commercially manufactured vehicle of a given year.

"State" includes the territories and the federal districts of the United States.

"Street rod vehicle" means a vehicle with a body design manufactured in 1948 or earlier or with a reproduction component that resembles a 1948 or earlier model which has been modified for safe road use, including, but not limited to, modifications of the drive train, suspension, and brake systems, modifications to the body through the use of materials such as steel or fiber glass, and other safety or comfort features.

"Vehicle" means a motor vehicle subject to the certificate of title provisions of part 1 of article 6 of this title but does not include commercial vehicles as defined in subsection (2) of this section.

"Vehicle identification number" means any identifying number, serial number, engine number, or other distinguishing number or mark, including letters, if any, that is unique to the identity of a given vehicle or commercial vehicle or component part thereof that was placed on a vehicle, commercial vehicle, or engine by its manufacturer or by authority of the department of revenue under section 42-12-202 or in accordance with the laws of another state or country.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2445, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

(3) and (13) amended, p. 1647, § 36, effective June 1.

L. 2010:

(5) amended, (HB 10-1096), ch. 240, p. 1051, § 1, effective August 11.

L. 2011:

(13) amended, (SB 11-031), ch. 86, p. 247, § 15, effective August 10.

42-5-202. Vehicle identification number inspection.

No bonded title vehicle, homemade vehicle, rebuilt vehicle, reconstructed vehicle, or vehicle assembled from a kit shall be sold in the state of Colorado or issued a Colorado certificate of title unless the seller or owner of such vehicle has had its vehicle identification number inspected and recorded by an inspector on the inspection form approved by the department of revenue.

No bonded title commercial vehicle, homemade commercial vehicle, rebuilt commercial vehicle, reconstructed commercial vehicle, or commercial vehicle assembled from a kit shall be issued a Colorado certificate of title unless an inspector inspects the vehicle identification number and records the number on the inspection form approved by the department of revenue.

(2.5) The department is authorized to perform a vehicle identification number inspection on any motor vehicle subject to this article that the department determines is necessary or convenient in carrying out its duties pursuant to this article and to charge and receive an inspection fee pursuant to section 42-5-204 for such inspection.

The inspections required by this section include a physical inspection of the vehicle or commercial vehicle and a computer check of the state and national compilations of wanted and stolen vehicles or commercial vehicles. If the inspector determines that the vehicle identification number has not been removed, changed, altered, or obliterated and that it is not the identification number of a wanted or stolen vehicle or commercial vehicle, the inspection form shall be transmitted to the executive director of the department of revenue, who shall then act upon the application for a Colorado certificate of title for such vehicle or commercial vehicle.

If the inspector determines that the vehicle identification number has been removed, changed, altered, or obliterated or if the inspector has good and sufficient reason to believe that the vehicle or commercial vehicle is wanted or was stolen in the state of Colorado or another state, the inspector shall proceed according to the provisions of part 1 of this article.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2446, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2001:

(2.5) added, p. 591, § 2, effective May 30.

42-5-203. Inspections - street rod vehicles. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2447, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1647, § 37, effective June 1.

L. 2011:

Entire section repealed, (SB 11-031), ch. 86, p. 249, § 22, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section was relocated to § 42-12-201 in 2011.

42-5-204. Inspection fees - vehicle number inspection fund - definition.

To have an inspection performed under this part 2, the requester must pay a fee of fifty dollars for each inspection performed. Upon payment of the fee, the inspector shall issue to the owner of the inspected vehicle or commercial vehicle a receipt as evidence of payment.
(1) (a) (I) To have an inspection performed under this part 2, the requester must pay a fee of fifty dollars for each inspection performed. Upon payment of the fee, the inspector shall issue to the owner of the inspected vehicle or commercial vehicle a receipt as evidence of payment.

On or before July 1, 2020, and each July 1 thereafter, the executive director of the department of revenue shall calculate the amount of the fee imposed under subsection (1)(a)(I) of this section for the next year using the rate of inflation for the prior year. The executive director shall round the fee to the nearest dollar increment. On or before July 1 of each year, the executive director shall certify the amount of the fee for the next year and publish the amount.

As used in this subsection (1)(a)(II), "inflation" means the annual percentage change in the United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, consumer price index for Denver-Aurora-Lakewood for all items and all urban consumers, or its successor index.

Notwithstanding the amount specified for the fee in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), the executive director of the department of revenue by rule or as otherwise provided by law may reduce the amount of the fee if necessary pursuant to section 24-75-402 (3), C.R.S., to reduce the uncommitted reserves of the fund to which all or any portion of the fee is credited. After the uncommitted reserves of the fund are sufficiently reduced, the executive director of the department of revenue by rule or as otherwise provided by law may increase the amount of the fee as provided in section 24-75-402 (4), C.R.S.

All inspection fees collected by the Colorado state patrol shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the vehicle identification number inspection fund, which fund is hereby created. The moneys in the fund shall be subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly for the administration and enforcement of this article, including the direct and indirect costs of the Colorado state patrol in performing inspections pursuant to this part 2. The moneys in the fund shall not be transferred or credited to the general fund or to any other fund; except that, at the end of each fiscal year, any unexpended and unencumbered moneys remaining in the fund shall be credited to the general fund.

All inspection fees collected by a law enforcement agency of a local government shall be credited to a special fund in the office of the treasurer of the local government. Such fund shall be separate and apart from the general fund of the local government and shall be made available for use by the law enforcement agency for the administration and enforcement of this part 2, including the training and certification of inspectors; except that the governing body of the local government, acting by resolution or ordinance, may order that the inspection fees be paid into the general fund of the local government.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2447, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 98:

(1) amended, p. 1359, § 114, effective June 1.

L. 2019:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 19-1300), ch. 280, p. 2624, § 1, effective August 2.

42-5-205. Assignment of a special vehicle identification number by the department of revenue. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2447, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1647, § 38, effective June 1.

L. 2011:

Entire section repealed, (SB 11-031), ch. 86, p. 249, § 22, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section was relocated to § 42-12-202 in 2011.

42-5-206. Certification of inspectors.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, no peace officer shall be an inspector of vehicle identification numbers unless the peace officer has been certified by the peace officers standards and training board pursuant to section 24-31-303 (1)(e), C.R.S. In order to be certified, the peace officer must satisfactorily complete a vehicle identification number inspection training course approved by said board and pay a certification fee to the board not to exceed twenty-five dollars. The cost of the training course shall include all necessary and actual expenses but shall not exceed fifty dollars per peace officer.

In lieu of the requirement for certification in subsection (1) of this section, any peace officer shall be certified as an inspector of vehicle identification numbers if the peace officer is able to demonstrate to the peace officers standards and training board that the peace officer has had sixteen hours or more of vehicle identification number inspection training which is acceptable to the board and which was received between January 1, 1986, and January 1, 1988.

The sheriff of any county and the police chief of any municipality may certify individuals in addition to peace officers to serve as inspectors in accordance with the provisions of this part 2. Such individuals shall be employees or bona fide representatives of a county or municipality and shall satisfactorily complete fingerprint and background checks. Such individuals must satisfactorily complete a vehicle identification number inspection training course approved by the peace officers standards and training board and pay a fee to the board for the cost of the certification not to exceed twenty-five dollars. The cost of the training course shall include all necessary and actual expenses but shall not exceed fifty dollars per individual.

A certification to perform vehicle identification number inspections expires three years after it is issued unless the certificate holder applies to have the certification renewed.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2448, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(1) amended, p. 961, § 21, effective May 25.

L. 2010:

(3) added, (HB 10-1096), ch. 240, p. 1051, § 2, effective August 11.

L. 2019:

(4) added, (HB 19-1300), ch. 280, p. 2624, § 2, effective August 2.

42-5-207. Rules.

The executive director of the department of revenue may adopt rules necessary to implement this part 2.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2448, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1648, § 39, effective June 1.